Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.330

Administrative dissolution.

The provisions of Article 6 of chapter 23.95 RCW relating to administrative dissolution by the secretary of state shall apply to every association subject to this chapter formed on or after July 23, 1989.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9110; 1991 c 72 s 21; 1989 c 307 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.